District of Columbia statutes.
7-1671.10

Fees.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized to establish, by rulemaking, fees for the registration of caregivers, cultivation centers, dispensaries, and qualifying patients and for the inspection and audit of cultivation centers and dispensaries.

(b)

Any of the fees collected pursuant to this chapter shall be applied first toward the cost of administering this chapter.

Feb. 25, 2010, D.C. Law 13-315, § 11
as added July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-210, § 2, 57 DCR 4798